Illinois, session 104th, HB273.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Illinois False Claims Act is amended by 5changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (740 ILCS 175/1)  (from Ch. 127, par. 4101)7    Sec. 1. This Act may be cited as the the Illinois False 8Claims Act.9(Source: P.A. 96-1304, eff. 7-27-10.)